Washington statutes.
RCW 30B.12.050

Certain criminal offenses.

(1) An officer, director, manager, managing participant, employee, shareholder, or participant of a state trust company commits an offense if the person knowingly:

(a) Conceals information or a fact, or removes, destroys, or conceals a book or record of the state trust company for the purpose of concealing information or a fact from the director or an agent of the director; or

(b) For the purpose of concealing, removes or destroys any book or record of the state trust company that is material to a pending or anticipated legal or administrative proceeding.

(2) An officer, director, manager, managing participant, or employee of a state trust company commits an offense if the person knowingly makes a false entry in the books or records or in any report or statement of the state trust company.

(3) An offense under this section is a class B felony.

[ 2014 c 37 s 351.]